Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2974.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TRANSPORTING WOOD WASTE FOR PROCESSING.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Nursery and Landscape Association to transport wood waste to wood waste facilities for processing. new text end